Utah statutes.
63M-4-401.   Creation of Office of Energy Development -- Director -- Purpose -- Rulemaking regarding confidential information.

(1)  There is created an Office of Energy Development.

(2) (a)  The governor's energy advisor shall appoint a director of the office.

(b)  The director shall report to the governor's energy advisor and may appoint staff as funding within existing budgets allows.

(c)  The office may consolidate energy staff and functions existing in the State Energy Program.

(3)  The purposes of the office are to:

(a)  serve as the primary resource for advancing energy development in the state; and

(b)  implement:

(i)  the state energy policy under Section 63M-4-301; and

(ii)  the governor's energy goals and objectives.

(4)  By following the procedures and requirements of Title 63J, Chapter 5, Federal Funds Procedures Act, the office may:

(a)  seek federal grants or loans;

(b)  seek to participate in federal programs; and

(c)  in accordance with applicable federal program guidelines, administer federally funded state energy programs.

(5)  The office shall perform the duties required by Sections 59-7-614.7 and 59-10-1029 and Part 5, Alternative Energy Development Tax Credit Act.

(6) (a)  For purposes of administering this section, the office may make rules, by following the procedures and requirements of Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, to maintain as confidential, and not as a public record, information that the office receives from any source.

(b)  The office shall maintain information the office receives from any source at the level of confidentiality assigned by the source.



Amended by Chapter 37, 2012 General Session 

Amended by Chapter 410, 2012 General Session

